Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 LICENSE PLATES
42-3-240. Special plates - Craig hospital.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2012, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the Craig hospital special license plate. The department may stop issuing the Craig hospital special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person may continue to use the Craig hospital special license plate after July 1, 2016.

Craig hospital may design the special license plates, but the design must conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a Craig hospital special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

Craig hospital, or its successor organization, shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Craig hospital license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Craig hospital special license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Craig hospital special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1298), ch. 251, p. 1090, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 18-1275), ch. 168, p. 1143, § 1, effective August 8.

42-3-241. Special plates - Colorado Rockies.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2013, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the Colorado Rockies special license plate. The department may stop issuing the Colorado Rockies special license plate if a total of three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2017. A person who was issued a Colorado Rockies special license plate on or before July 1, 2017, may continue to use the Colorado Rockies special license plate after July 1, 2017, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The Colorado Rockies baseball club foundation may design the special license plate if the plate conforms with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a Colorado Rockies special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by the Colorado Rockies baseball club foundation, or its successor organization, confirming that the applicant has donated fifty-two dollars and eighty cents to the foundation.

The Colorado Rockies baseball club foundation, or its successor organization, shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section are the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Colorado Rockies special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Colorado Rockies special license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Colorado Rockies license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1295), ch. 89, p. 290, § 1, effective August 8.

42-3-242. Special plates - fallen heroes.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2013, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the fallen heroes special license plate. The department may stop issuing the fallen heroes special license plate if a total of three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2017. A person who was issued a fallen heroes special license plate on or before July 1, 2017, may continue to use the fallen heroes special license plate after July 1, 2017, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The Colorado chapter of the concerns of police survivors, inc., may design the special license plate if the plate conforms with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a fallen heroes license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by the Colorado chapter of the concerns of police survivors, inc., or its successor organization, confirming that the applicant has donated fifty dollars to the Colorado chapter of the concerns of police survivors, inc.

The Colorado chapter of the concerns of police survivors, inc., or its successor organization, shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section are the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized fallen heroes special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of fallen heroes special license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized fallen heroes special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1023), ch. 134, p. 460, § 1, effective August 8.

42-3-243. Special plates - child loss awareness.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2013, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the child loss awareness license plate. The department may stop issuing the child loss awareness special license plate if a total of three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2017. A person who was issued a child loss awareness special license plate on or before July 1, 2017, may continue to use the child loss awareness special license plate after July 1, 2017, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The Rowan tree foundation may design the special license plates if the design conforms with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a child loss awareness license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section are the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized child loss awareness license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of child loss awareness license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized child loss awareness license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1131), ch. 146, p. 526, § 1, effective August 8.

42-3-244. Special plates - flight for life Colorado.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2013, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the flight for life Colorado license plate. The department may stop issuing the flight for life Colorado license plate if a total of three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2017. A person who was issued a flight for life Colorado license plate on or before July 1, 2017, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2017, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the license plate.

Flight for life Colorado may design the special license plate if the plate conforms with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a flight for life Colorado license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate issued by flight for life Colorado, or its successor organization, confirming that the applicant has donated twenty-five dollars to flight for life Colorado.

Flight for life Colorado, or its successor organization, shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section are the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized flight for life Colorado license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of flight for life Colorado license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized flight for life Colorado license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1302), ch. 215, p. 926, § 1, effective August 8.

42-3-245. Special plates - wildlife sporting.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2013, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight; except that the department shall not issue the license plate until the proponents comply with section 42-3-207 (6).

There is hereby established the wildlife sporting license plate. The department may stop issuing the license plate if a total of three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2017. A person who was issued a license plate on or before July 1, 2017, may continue to use the license plate after July 1, 2017, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The division of parks and wildlife may design the special license plate in consultation with sportsmen's advisory groups. The plate must conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a wildlife sporting license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect the following fees:

A one-time, twenty-five-dollar fee for issuance or replacement of the license plate, which fee the department shall transmit to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.;

A one-time, ten-dollar fee for issuance or replacement of the wildlife sporting license plate, which fee the department shall transmit to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the wildlife cash fund created in section 33-1-112, C.R.S.; and

An annual twenty-five-dollar renewal fee, which the department shall transmit to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the wildlife cash fund created in section 33-1-112, C.R.S.; except that the department and its authorized agents may retain the portion of the fee necessary to offset implementing this subparagraph (III), up to a maximum of two dollars.

The division of parks and wildlife shall use the money from fees paid under subparagraphs (II) and (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) for the following purposes:

Providing grants to create and enhance shooting ranges and areas throughout Colorado to increase public recreational shooting opportunities, including hunter education, marksmanship training, and youth shooting;

Providing grants to local and county governments, park and recreation departments, water districts, angling organizations, and others for projects to improve fishing opportunities in Colorado.

An applicant may apply for personalized wildlife sporting license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of wildlife sporting license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized wildlife sporting license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1275), ch. 194, p. 773, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1708, § 136, effective August 7.

42-3-246. Special plates - "Protect Our Rivers".

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2014, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the "Protect Our Rivers" license plate. The department may stop issuing the "Protect Our Rivers" license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2017. A person may continue to use the "Protect Our Rivers" license plate after July 1, 2017.

Colorado trout unlimited may design the special license plates, but the design must conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a "Protect Our Rivers" license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by Colorado trout unlimited or its successor organization, confirming that the applicant has donated twenty-five dollars to Colorado trout unlimited.

Colorado trout unlimited shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization unless the department stops issuing the license plate pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section.

Colorado trout unlimited shall not use any moneys from a donation made under paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) for litigation or lobbying.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section are the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized "Protect Our Rivers" license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of "Protect Our Rivers" license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized "Protect Our Rivers" license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-224), ch. 245, p. 1184, § 1, effective August 7.

42-3-247. Special plates - emergency medical services (EMS).

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2015, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the EMS license plate. The department may stop issuing the EMS license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2019. A person who was issued an EMS license plate on or before July 1, 2019, may continue to use the license plate after July 1, 2019, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The emergency medical services association of Colorado may design the special license plate, but the plate must conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for an EMS license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate issued by the emergency medical services association of Colorado, or its successor organization, confirming that the applicant has donated ten dollars to the emergency medical services association of Colorado.

The emergency medical services association of Colorado, or its successor organization, shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization unless the department stops issuing the license plate.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section are the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized EMS license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of EMS license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized EMS license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-036), ch. 334, p. 1486, § 1, effective August 6.

42-3-248. Special plates - Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS).

Beginning the later of January 1, 2016, or when the Rocky Mountain Chapter of the ALS Association has complied with section 42-3-207 (6), the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the ALS license plate. The department may stop issuing the ALS license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2020. A person who was issued an ALS license plate on or before July 1, 2020, may continue to use the license plate after July 1, 2020, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The Rocky Mountain Chapter of the ALS Association may design the special license plate, but the plate must conform to standards established by the department.

A person may apply for an ALS license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized ALS license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of ALS license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized ALS license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-229), ch. 293, p. 1195, § 1, effective August 5.

42-3-249. Special plates - Rocky Mountain National Park.

Beginning the earlier of November 15, 2015, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the Rocky Mountain National Park license plate. The department may stop issuing the Rocky Mountain National Park license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2020. A person who was issued a Rocky Mountain National Park license plate on or before July 1, 2020, may continue to use the license plate after July 1, 2020, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The Rocky Mountain Conservancy may design the special license plate, but the plate must conform with standards established by the department.

At least once every five years, the department shall designate an organization to qualify applicants to be issued the Rocky Mountain National Park license plate. The organization must:

Be based in Colorado;

Have been in existence for at least ten years;

Manage a conservation program for the benefit of the park;

Help promote the stewardship of the park;

Fund trail building and maintenance within the park;

Provide interns or volunteers to staff visitor centers or deliver education programs to visitors; and

Have provided at least five hundred thousand dollars' worth of support annually to the park for the last five years.

A person may apply for a Rocky Mountain National Park license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate issued by the organization chosen in accordance with this subsection (3) confirming that the applicant has made a donation to the organization. The organization may establish a minimum donation amount to qualify for the plate. The amount must neither be less than twenty-five dollars nor more than seventy-five dollars. The organization shall use the donation to support Rocky Mountain National Park in a manner specified by the national park service.

The organization chosen in accordance with this subsection (3) shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization unless the department stops issuing the license plate.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect an additional one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Rocky Mountain National Park license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Rocky Mountain National Park license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1313), ch. 243, p. 898, § 1, effective August 5.

42-3-250. Special plates - Pueblo chile license plate.

Beginning on the earlier of September 1, 2018, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the Pueblo chile license plate. The department may stop issuing the Pueblo chile license plate if fewer than three thousand license plates are issued by July 1, 2022. A person who was issued a Pueblo chile license plate on or before July 1, 2022, may continue to use the license plate after July 1, 2022, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The department shall use a design from an association of Pueblo chile growers, but the design must conform to department standards and be approved by the department.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect an additional one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201.

An applicant may apply for personalized Pueblo chile license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Pueblo chile license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized license plates under this subsection (4) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (4) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1012), ch. 142, p. 472, § 1, effective April 18.

42-3-251. Special plates - aviation license plate.

Beginning on the earlier of September 1, 2018, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the aviation license plate. The department may stop issuing the aviation license plate if fewer than three thousand license plates are issued by July 1, 2022. A person who was issued an aviation license plate on or before July 1, 2022, may continue to use the license plate after July 1, 2022, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The department shall use a design of the Colorado Aviation Business Association, but the design must conform to department standards and be approved by the department.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect an additional one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201.

An applicant may apply for personalized aviation license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of aviation license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized license plates under this subsection (4) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (4) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1212), ch. 378, p. 1947, § 1, effective August 9.

42-3-252. Special plates - childhood cancer awareness plate - short title.

The short title of this section is the "Gabriel Santistevan Childhood Cancer License Plate Act".

Beginning on or before January 1, 2019, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the childhood cancer awareness license plate. The department may stop issuing the plate if fewer than three thousand plates are issued by July 1, 2023. A person who was issued a childhood cancer awareness license plate on or before July 1, 2023, may continue to use it after July 1, 2023, regardless of whether the department stops issuing the special license plate.

The department shall use a design from an organization meeting the standards of subsection (4) of this section, but the design must conform to department standards and be approved by the department.

At least once every five years, the department shall designate an organization to qualify applicants to be issued the childhood cancer awareness license plate. The organization must:

Be headquartered in Colorado;

Have been in existence for at least five years;

Ensure that the money from the donations required in subsection (4)(b) of this section covers costs for operations in Colorado or is spent, in accordance with subsection (4)(a)(IV) of this section, in Colorado; and

Spend at least fifty percent of the organization's revenue financially assisting:

Families with minors being treated in Colorado for cancer; or

Research foundations that provide money for pediatric cancer research.

A person may apply for a childhood cancer awareness license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate issued by the organization chosen in accordance with this subsection (4) confirming that the applicant has made a donation to the organization. The organization may establish a minimum donation amount to qualify for the plate. The amount must neither be less than twenty-five dollars nor more than seventy-five dollars. The organization shall use the donation to financially assist:

Families of a minor being treated in Colorado for cancer; or

Research foundations that provide money for pediatric cancer research.

To qualify applicants to have a childhood cancer awareness license plate, the organization chosen in accordance with this subsection (4) must file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization unless the department stops issuing the license plate.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect an additional one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of the license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201.

An applicant may apply for personalized childhood cancer awareness license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of childhood cancer awareness license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized license plates under this subsection (6) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (6) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1255), ch. 226, p. 1434, § 1, effective August 8.